District of Columbia statutes.
2-406

Compromise of claim or suit.

Upon a report by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia showing in detail the just and true amount and condition of any claim or suit which the District of Columbia may on July 31, 1951, or thereafter have against any person, firm, association, or corporation, and the terms upon which the same may be compromised, and stating that in his opinion a compromise of such claim or suit would be for the best interest of the District of Columbia, the Mayor of the District of Columbia hereby is authorized to compromise such claim or suit accordingly: Provided, that this section shall not apply to claims or suits for taxes or special assessments.

Feb. 11, 1929, 45 Stat. 1161, ch. 173, § 5
July 31, 1951, 65 Stat. 131, ch. 274, § 2
June 28, 1967, 81 Stat. 81, Pub. L. 90-33, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 158(f)
Feb. 26, 1981, D.C. Law 3-114, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5628
1981 Ed., § 1-1206.
1973 Ed., § 1-906.
Settlement of Monetary Penalties resulting from Parking Infractions, see Mayor’s Order 2011-127, July 29, 2011 ( 58 DCR 6691).
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.